Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2107
Board of directors; investigatory powers.

The board of directors of the metropolitan utilities district or any committee of the members of the board shall have power to compel the attendance of witnesses for investigation of any matters that may come before the board, and the presiding officer of the board, or the chairperson of the committee for the time being, may administer the requisite oaths, and the board or committee thereof shall have the same authority to compel the giving of testimony as is conferred on courts of justice.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 7, p. 353;

R.S.1913, § 4249;

C.S.1922, § 3752;

C.S.1929, § 14-1008;

R.S.1943, § 14-1012;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1012;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 7.

The word may in this section makes the administration of oaths a discretionary matter for the board. Flood v. Keller, 214 Neb. 797, 336 N.W.2d 549 (1983).